Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-206
Right of privacy; defenses and privileges.

In addition to any defenses and privileges created in sections 20-201 to 20-211 and 25-840.01, the statutory right of privacy created in sections 20-201 to 20-211 and 25-840.01 shall be subject to the following defenses and privileges:

(1) All applicable federal and Nebraska statutory and constitutional defenses;

(2) As to communications alleged to constitute an invasion of privacy, the defense that the communication was made under circumstances that would give rise to an applicable qualified or absolute privilege according to the law of defamation; and

(3) All applicable, qualified, and absolute privileges and defenses in the common law of privacy in this state and other states.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 6.